New Jersey, session 221, S545.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Each member of the Legislature shall pay a fine of $250 for each day or part thereof during a state of emergency that is declared due to the failure to enact a general appropriation law as prescribed by Article VIII, Section II, paragraph 2 of the New Jersey Constitution.  The fine shall be paid to the State Treasurer for deposit into the State General Fund. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.